Ohio, session 136, HB684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 755.16, 3311.05, 3311.053, 3311.0510, 3313.01, 3313.376, 3313.843, 3313.845, 3313.846, 3313.848, 3313.849, 3317.11, 3319.80, 3326.45, 3513.255, and 3513.256 be amended; section 3326.45 (3313.847) be amended for the purpose of adopting a new section number as indicated in parentheses; and section 3311.052 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 755.16. (A) Any contracting subdivision, jointly with one or more other contracting subdivisions, in any combination, may acquire property for, construct, operate, and maintain any parks, playgrounds, playfields, gymnasiums, public baths, swimming pools, indoor recreation centers, educational facilities, or community centers. Any school district, educational service center, or state institution of higher education may provide by the erection of any school, educational service center, or state institution of higher education building or premises, or by the enlargement of, addition to, or reconstruction or improvement of any school, educational service center, or state institution of higher education building or premises, for the inclusion of any such parks, recreational facilities, educational facilities, and community centers to be jointly acquired, constructed, operated, and maintained. Any contracting subdivision, jointly with one or more other contracting subdivisions, in any combination, may equip, operate, and maintain those parks, recreational facilities, educational facilities, and community centers and may appropriate money for those purposes. Any contracting subdivision agreeing to jointly acquire, construct, operate, or maintain parks, recreational facilities, educational facilities, and community centers pursuant to this section may contribute lands, money, other personal property, or services to the joint venture, as may be agreed upon. Any agreement shall specify the rights of the parties in any lands or personal property contributed. Any lands acquired by a township park district pursuant to Chapter 511. of the Revised Code and established as a public park or parks may be contributed to a joint venture authorized by this section. Fees may be charged in connection with the use of any recreational facilities, educational facilities, and community centers that may be constructed on those lands. (B) Any township may, jointly with a private land owner, construct, operate, equip, and maintain free public playgrounds and playfields. Any equipment provided by a township pursuant to this division shall remain township property and shall be used subject to a right of removal by the township. (C) As used in this section and in sections 755.17 and 755.18 of the Revised Code: (1) "Community centers" means facilities characterized by all of the following: (a) They are acquired, constructed, operated, or maintained by contracting subdivisions pursuant to division (A) of this section. (b) They may be used for governmental, civic, or educational operations or purposes, or recreational activities. (c) They may be used only by the contracting subdivisions that acquire, construct, operate, or maintain them or by any other person upon terms and conditions determined by those contracting subdivisions. (2) "Educational service center" has the same meaning as in division (A) of section 3311.05 of the Revised Code. (3) "Contracting subdivision" means a municipal corporation, township, joint recreation district, township park district, a park district created under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code, county, school district, educational service center, or state institution of higher education. (4) "School district" means any of the school districts or joint vocational school districts referred to in section 3311.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3311.05. (A) The territory within the territorial limits of a As used in this section and sections 3311.051 to 3311.0510 of the Revised Code, "client," "primary service agreement," and "service agreement" have the same meanings as in section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. (B) There is in each county, or the territory included in a district each group of counties formed under section 3311.053 of the Revised Code, exclusive of the territory embraced in any city school district or exempted village school district, and excluding the territory detached therefrom for school purposes and including the territory attached thereto for school purposes constitutes an educational service center. If the educational service center in which the territory of a local school district is located is dissolved under section 3311.0510 of the Revised Code, the territory of that local school district shall not constitute part of any educational service center. (B) (C)(1) During the period beginning on the effective date of this amendment and ending on the next thirtieth day of June of an odd-numbered year, the territory of an educational service center is as it existed immediately before the effective date of this amendment. (2)(a) Beginning on the first day of July of an odd-numbered year after the effective date of this amendment, the territory of an educational service center consists of the combined territory of all of the school districts that have primary service agreements with the educational service center under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether that territory is located in the county or group of counties for which the educational service center was established. (b) The territory or service area of any client that has a service agreement with an educational service center under section 3313.844, 3313.845, 3313.846, or 3313.847 of the Revised Code is not part of the territory of the educational service center unless the territory is also part of the territory of a school district that has a primary service agreement with the educational service center under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. (3) Not later than the first day of May of each odd-numbered year, an educational service center shall send a written notice to the board of elections of each county in which the educational service center will have territory as of the first day of July of that year. The notice shall identify each school district that has a primary service agreement with the educational service center under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code as of the first day of July of that year. (D) A county school financing district created under section 3311.50 of the Revised Code is not the school district described in division (A) of this section an educational service center or any other school district but is a taxing district. Sec. 3311.052. (A) During the period beginning on the effective date of this section and ending on the next thirtieth day of December of an odd-numbered year after the effective date of this section, the membership of the governing board of an educational service center is as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section, and any vacancy on the board shall be filled in accordance with the law as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section. (B) Beginning on the first day of January of an even-numbered year after the effective date of this section, subject to divisions (C) and (D) of this section, all of the following apply: (1) The governing board of an educational service center consists of members equal to the number of school districts that have primary service agreements with the educational service center under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code as of the first day of July of the previous year, with one member elected by the electors of each such school district. Each member shall be an elector of the school district the member represents on the governing board. (2) The members of the governing board shall be elected at regular municipal elections to serve two-year terms beginning on the first day of January after the election and ending on the last day of December of the year following the year of the election. (3) A vacancy in the office of member of the governing board shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by appointment by a majority vote of the board of education of the school district the member represents. Within ten days after the vacancy is filled, the educational service center shall send a written notice of the appointment to the board of elections of each county in which the educational service center has territory. (4) If a school district terminates its primary service agreement with the educational service center, the school district remains entitled to be represented by a member of the governing board for the remainder of the member's unexpired term. (5) When a school district that does not currently have a primary service agreement with the educational service center enters into such an agreement, the electors of the school district are first entitled to elect a member of the governing board of the educational service center for a term beginning on the first day of January after the primary service agreement takes effect. (6) The fact that any client has a service agreement with an educational service center under section 3313.844, 3313.845, 3313.846, or 3313.847 of the Revised Code does not entitle the client to be represented on the governing board of the educational service center. (C) A member of the governing board of an educational service center who is serving as of the effective date of this section retains the member's position until the expiration of the member's existing term. If the member's seat becomes vacant before the expiration of the existing term, the vacancy shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in accordance with the law as it existed immediately before the effective date of this section. (D)(1) If, under divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the governing board of an educational service center would have an even number of members, then not later than the tenth day of January of an even-numbered year, the members shall, by a majority vote, appoint one additional member who is an elector of the territory of the educational service center to serve a term of office ending on the last day of December of the following year. If the members fail to appoint the additional member not later than the tenth day of January, the probate judge of the county in which the greatest number of pupils under the supervision of the educational service center reside shall appoint the additional member. (2) A vacancy in the seat of the additional member shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the initial appointment was required to be made under division (D)(1) of this section. (3) Within ten days after an appointment is made under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, the educational service center shall send a written notice of the appointment to the board of elections of each county in which the educational service center has territory. Sec. 3311.053. (A) The (A)(1) Beginning on the first day of July of an odd-numbered year after the effective date of this amendment, the boards of education of up to five adjoining educational service centers may, by identical resolutions adopted by a majority of the members of each governing board within any sixty-day period, combine such educational service centers into one educational service center for the combined territory. No such combination shall occur during the period beginning on the effective date of this amendment and ending on the next thirtieth day of June of an odd-numbered year. (2) The resolutions shall state the name of the new center, which may be styled as a "joint educational service center." The resolutions shall also indicate whether the governing board of the new educational service center is to be formed in accordance with division (B) of this section, in accordance with division (A) of section 3311.054 of the Revised Code, or in accordance with section 3311.057 of the Revised Code. (3) A copy of each resolution shall be filed with the state board of education and with the board of elections of each county in which the new educational service center has territory. The (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, the new educational service center shall be created and the members of the governing boards of the participating educational service centers shall be dissolved and a new are members of the governing board established thirty days after the date on which the last resolution was filed with the state board of the new educational service center for the duration of their original terms of office. (B) The initial members of a new governing board established in accordance with this division shall be appointed as follows: (1) If two educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint two members to the new governing board and the four members so selected shall select a fifth member within ten days of the date on which the last of the four members is appointed. (2) If three educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board and the three members so selected shall select the remaining two members of the governing board within ten days of the date on which the last of the three members is appointed. (3) If four educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board and the four members so selected shall select the remaining member of the governing board within ten days of the date on which the last of the four members is appointed. (4) If five educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board. If the members appointed to a new governing board by the governing boards of the combining educational service centers are unable to agree on the selection of the remaining members of the new governing board within ten days, the probate judge of the county in which the greatest number of pupils under the supervision of the new educational service center reside shall appoint the remaining members. Electors of the new educational service center shall elect a new governing board at the next general election occurring in an odd-numbered year and more than ninety days after the date of the appointment of the last member to the initial governing board. Members shall serve for the duration of the term to which they are elected or until their successors are elected and qualified. At such election, two members shall be elected to terms of two years and three members shall be elected to terms of four years. Thereafter, their successors shall be elected in the same manner and for the same terms as members of governing boards of all educational service centers. Each candidate for election as a member of the educational service center governing board shall file a nominating petition in accordance with section 3513.255 of the Revised Code. (2) If the governing board of the new educational service center has an even number of members, the members shall, by a majority vote, appoint one additional member who is an elector of the territory of the educational service center to serve the same term of office as the elected members. If the members are unable to agree on the appointment of the additional member within ten days after the board forms, the probate judge of the county in which the greatest number of pupils under the supervision of the new educational service center reside shall appoint the additional member. Within ten days after an appointment is made under this division, the educational service center shall send a written notice of the appointment to the board of elections of each county in which the educational service center has territory. (C) The funds of each former educational service center shall be paid over in full to the governing board of the new educational service center, and the legal title to all property of the former governing boards shall become vested in the new governing board. The governing board of an educational service center created under this section shall honor all service agreements and other contracts made by the former governing boards. Sec. 3311.0510. (A) If all of the client school districts of an educational service center have terminated their primary service agreements with the service center under division (D) of section 3313.843 of the Revised Code, upon the latest effective date of the terminations, the governing board of that service center shall be abolished and such service center shall be dissolved by order of the director of education and workforce. The director's order shall provide for the equitable division and disposition of the assets, property, debts, and obligations of the service center among the school districts that were client school districts of the service center for the service center's last fiscal year of operation. The director's order shall provide that the tax duplicate of each of those school districts shall be bound for and assume the district's equitable share of the outstanding indebtedness of the service center. The director's order is final and is not appealable. Immediately upon the abolishment of the service center governing board pursuant to this section, the director shall appoint a qualified individual to administer the dissolution of the service center and to implement the terms of the director's dissolution order. Prior to distributing assets to any school district under this section, but after paying in full other debts and obligations of the service center under this section, the director may assess against the remaining assets of the service center the amount of the costs incurred by the department of education and workforce in performing the director's duties under this division, including the fees, if any, owed to the individual appointed to administer the director's dissolution order. Any excess cost incurred by the department under this division shall be divided equitably among the school districts that were client school districts of the service center for the service center's last fiscal year of operation. Each district's share of that excess cost shall be bound against the tax duplicate of that district. (B) A final audit of the former service center shall be performed in accordance with procedures established by the auditor of state. (C) The public records of an educational service center that is dissolved under this section shall be transferred in accordance with this division. Public records maintained by the service center in connection with services provided by the service center to local school districts of which the territory of the service center is or previously was made up shall be transferred to each of the respective local school districts. Public records maintained by the service center in connection with services provided to client school districts shall be transferred to each of the respective client school districts. All other public records maintained by the service center at the time the service center ceases operations shall be transferred to the Ohio history connection for analysis and disposition by the Ohio history connection in its capacity as archives administrator for the state and its political subdivisions pursuant to division (C) of section 149.30 and section 149.31 of the Revised Code. (D) As used in this section, "client school district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district that has entered into an agreement under section 3313.843 or 3313.845 of the Revised Code to receive any services from an educational service center. Sec. 3313.01. In local and exempted village school districts an educational service centers, except as provided in section 3311.054 and 3311.056 of the Revised Code, the board of education or governing board of an educational service center shall consist of five members who shall be electors residing in the territory composing the respective districts and shall be elected at large in their respective districts. Sec. 3313.376. As used in this section, "client school district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district that has entered into an agreement under " has the same meaning as in section 3313.843 or 3313.845 of the Revised Code to receive any services from an educational service center. For the purpose of obtaining quantity discounts in purchasing textbooks; computer equipment, including computer software; school buses; and natural gas, electricity, and other utility services, the governing boards of two or more educational service centers may enter into agreements, including installment purchase and lease-purchase contracts, to jointly purchase such commodities to be utilized by client school districts the clients of the educational service centers. Sec. 3313.843. (A) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to any cooperative education school district. As used in this section and sections 3313.844 to 3313.849 of the Revised Code: (1) "Client" means any of the following that has a service agreement with an educational service center: a city, local, or exempted village school district, a joint vocational school district, a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or a political subdivision. (2) "Governing body" means the board of education of a school district, the governing authority of a community school, the governing body of a STEM school, or the governing body of a political subdivision. (3) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code but does not include a school district, community school, or STEM school. (4) "Primary service agreement" means a service agreement between a city, local, or exempted village school district and an educational service center entered into under this section but does not include a supplemental service agreement entered into under section 3313.845 of the Revised Code. (5) "Service agreement" or "agreement" means an agreement between a client and an educational service center under section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, 3313.846, 3313.847, or former section 3326.45 of the Revised Code for the educational service center to provide services to the client and any subsequent amendment to that agreement. (B)(1) The board of education of each a city, exempted village, or local school district with an average daily student enrollment of sixteen thousand or less, reported for the district on the most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, shall may enter into an a primary service agreement with the governing board of an any educational service center, under which the educational service center governing board will provide services to the district. (2) The board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district with an average daily student enrollment of more than sixteen thousand may enter into an agreement with the governing board of an educational service center, under which the educational service center governing board will provide services to the district. (3) (2) A primary service agreement under this section shall be for a renewable period of two consecutive school years, beginning on the first day of July of an odd-numbered year and ending on the last day of June of the next odd-numbered year. (3) A school district board of education and an educational service center that enter into or renew a primary service agreement shall execute the initial or renewed service agreement not later than the first day of May of the year in which the service agreement takes effect. (4) If a school district board does not intend to renew its primary service agreement with an educational service center, it shall notify the educational service center of that fact in writing not later than the first day of January of the year in which the service agreement expires. If the school district board fails to notify the educational service center by that deadline, the service agreement is automatically renewed for an additional period of two consecutive school years. (C) Services provided under an a primary service agreement entered into under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall be specified in the agreement, and may include any of the following: supervisory teachers; in-service and continuing education programs for district personnel; curriculum services; research and development programs; academic instruction for which the governing board employs teachers pursuant to section 3319.02 of the Revised Code; assistance in the provision of special accommodations and classes for students with disabilities; or any other services the district board and service center governing board agree can be better provided by the service center and are not provided under an agreement entered into under section 3313.845 of the Revised Code. Services included in the agreement shall be provided to the district in the manner specified in the agreement. The district board of education shall reimburse the educational service center governing board pursuant to division (H) (I) of this section. (C) Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section (D) Not later than the first day of May of each odd-numbered year, an educational service center shall be filed file a copy of each of its primary service agreements entered into under this section that take effect in that year with the department of education and workforce by the first day of July of the school year for which the agreement is in effect. (D)(1) An agreement for services from an educational service center entered into under this section may be terminated by the school district board of education, at its option, by notifying the governing board of the service center by March 1, 2012, or by the first day of January of any odd-numbered year thereafter, that the district board intends to terminate the agreement in that year, and that termination shall be effective on the thirtieth day of June of that year. The failure of a district board to notify an educational service center of its intent to terminate an agreement by March 1, 2012, shall result in renewal of the existing agreement for the following school year. Thereafter, the failure of a district board to notify an educational service center of its intent to terminate an agreement by the first day of January of an odd-numbered year shall result in renewal of the existing agreement for the following two school years. (2) If the school district that terminates an agreement for services under division (D)(1) of this section is also subject to the requirement of division (B)(1) of this section, the district board shall enter into a new agreement with any educational service center so that the new agreement is effective on the first day of July of that same year. (3) (E) If all moneys owed by a school district to an educational service center under an a primary service agreement for services terminated under division (D)(1) (B)(4) of this section have been paid in full by the effective date of the termination, the governing board of the service center shall submit an affidavit to the department certifying that fact not later than fifteen days after the termination's effective date. Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, until the department receives such an affidavit, it shall not make any payments to any other educational service center with which the district enters into an agreement under this section for services that the educational service center provides to the district. (E) (F) An educational service center may apply to any state or federal agency for competitive grants. It may also apply to any private entity for additional funds. (F) Not later than January 1, 2014, each (G) Each educational service center shall post on its web site a list of all of the services that it provides and the corresponding cost for each of those services. (G)(1)(H)(1) For purposes of calculating any state operating subsidy to be paid to an educational service center for the operation of that service center and any services required under Title XXXIII of the Revised Code to be provided by the service center to a school district, the service center's student count shall be the sum of the total student counts of all the school districts with which the educational service center has entered into an agreement under this section. (2) When a district enters into a new primary service agreement with a new educational service center, the department shall ensure that the state operating subsidy for services provided to the district is paid to the new educational service center and that the educational service center with which the district previously had an agreement is no longer paid a state operating subsidy for providing services to that district. (H) (I) Pursuant to division (B) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department annually shall deduct from each school district that enters into an a primary service agreement with an educational service center under this section, and pay to the service center, an amount equal to six dollars and fifty cents times the school district's total student count. The district board of education, or the district superintendent acting on behalf of the district board, may agree to pay an amount in excess of six dollars and fifty cents per student in total student count. If a majority of the boards of education, or superintendents acting on behalf of the boards, of the districts that entered into an agreement under this section approve an amount in excess of six dollars and fifty cents per student in total student count, each district shall pay the excess amount to the service center. (I)(1) (J)(1) An educational service center may enter into a contract to purchase supplies, materials, equipment, and services, which may include those specified in division (B)(C) of this section or Chapter 3312. of the Revised Code, or the delivery of such services, on behalf of a school district, community school, STEM school, or political subdivision that has entered into an agreement with the service center under this section or section 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3313.846, or 3313.847 of the Revised Code. (2) Purchases made by a school district, community school, STEM school, or political subdivision that has entered into an agreement with the service center as described in this division are exempt from competitive bidding required by law for the purchase of supplies, materials, equipment, or services. No political subdivision shall make any purchase under this division when the political subdivision has received bids for such purchase, unless the same terms, conditions, and specifications at a lower price can be made for such purchase under this division. (J) (K) Any school district, community school, or STEM school that has entered into an agreement with an educational service center under this section or section 3313.844 or , 3313.845, or 3313.847 of the Revised Code shall be in compliance with federal law and exempt from competitive bidding requirements for personnel-based services pursuant to the authority granted to the Ohio department of education and workforce under federal law, provided the service center has met the following conditions: (1) It is in compliance with division (F) (G) of this section. (2) It has been designated "high performing" under rule of the department. (3) It has been found to be substantially in compliance with audit rules and guidelines in its most recent audit by the auditor of state. (K)(L) For purposes of this section, a school district's "total student count" means the average daily student enrollment reported on the most recent report card issued for the district pursuant to section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (M) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to any cooperative education school district. Sec. 3313.845. (A) The board of education of a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district and the governing board of an educational service center may enter into an agreement under which the educational service center will provide services to the school district. Services provided under the agreement and the amount to be paid for such services shall be mutually agreed to by the district board of education and the service center governing board, and shall be specified in the agreement. Payment for services specified in the agreement shall be made pursuant to the terms of that agreement. If specified in the agreement as the manner of payment, the department of education and workforce shall pay the service center the amount due to it under the agreement and shall deduct that amount from the payments made to the city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be valid only if a copy is filed with the department. (B) The authority granted under this section to the boards board of education of a city, exempted village, and or local school districts is in addition to the authority granted to such boards district that has a primary service agreement with an educational service center under section 3313.843 of the Revised Code may enter into a supplemental service agreement with the governing board of another educational service center under which the educational service center will provide services to the school district. Services provided under the supplemental service agreement and the amount to be paid for such services shall be mutually agreed to by the district board of education and the service center governing board and shall be specified in the agreement. Payment for services specified in the agreement shall be made pursuant to the terms of that agreement. If specified in the agreement as the manner of payment, the department of education and workforce shall pay the service center the amount due to it under the agreement and shall deduct that amount from the payments made to the city, exempted village, or local school district under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this division is valid only if a copy is filed with the department. Sec. 3313.846. The governing board of an educational service center may enter into a contract service agreement with any a political subdivision as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, not including school districts, community schools, or STEM schools contracting for services under section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3326.45 of the Revised Code, under which the educational service center will provide services to the political subdivision. Services provided under the contract service agreement and the amount to be paid for such services shall be mutually agreed to by the parties and shall be specified in the contractagreement. The political subdivision shall directly pay an educational service center for services specified in the contract agreement. The board of the educational service center shall file a copy of each contract service agreement entered into under this section with the department of education and workforce by the first day the contract agreement is in effect. Sec. 3326.45 3313.847. (A) The governing body of a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school may contract enter into a service agreement with the governing board of an educational service center or contract with the board of education of a joint vocational school district for the provision of services to the STEM school or to any student enrolled in the school. Services provided under the service agreement or contract and the amount to be paid for those services shall be mutually agreed to by the parties to the service agreement or contract, and shall be specified in the service agreement or contract. (B) A contract service agreement entered into under this section may require an educational service center to provide any one or a combination of the following services to a STEM school: (1) Supervisory teachers; (2) In-service and continuing education programs for personnel of the STEM school; (3) Curriculum services as provided to the client school districts of the service center; (4) Research and development programs; (5) Academic instruction for which the service center governing board employs teachers; (6) Assistance in the provision of special accommodations and classes for students with disabilities. Services described in division (B) of this section shall be provided to the STEM school in the same manner they are provided to client school districts other clients of the service center, unless otherwise specified in the contract service agreement. The contract service agreement shall specify whether the service center will receive a per-pupil payment from the department of education and workforce for the provision of these services and, if so, the amount of the per-pupil payment. (C) For each service agreement or contract entered into under this section, the department shall deduct the amount owed by the STEM school from the state funds due to the STEM school under this chapter and shall pay that amount to the educational service center or joint vocational school district that is party to the service agreement or contract. (D) No service agreement or contract entered into under this section shall be valid unless a copy is filed with the department by the first day of the school year for which the service agreement or contract is in effect. (E) As used in this section, "client school district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district that has entered into an agreement under section 3313.843 or 3313.845 of the Revised Code to receive any services from an educational service center. Sec. 3313.848. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Client" means a city, local, or exempted village school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or political subdivision. (2) "Governing body" means the board of education of a school district, governing authority of a community school, governing body of a STEM school, or governing body of a political subdivision. (3) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as used in section 3313.846 of the Revised Code. (4) "Service agreement" means an agreement that a client has entered into with an educational service center under section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, 3313.846, or 3326.45 of the Revised Code and any subsequent amendment to that agreement. (B) If at the end of a fiscal year for which a service agreement is in effect any of the funds paid directly by a client to the educational service center under the agreement are unexpended and unobligated, a client's governing body may elect to have the service center retain the unexpended and unobligated funds for the purpose of applying them toward any payment the client will owe to the service center under a service agreement for the next fiscal year. The treasurer or fiscal officer of the client shall indicate on the client's end-of-year financial report that unexpended funds have been retained by the service center and the amount of those funds. (C) (B) A client shall expend its funds retained under division (B) (A) of this section only for services specifically set forth under a service agreement. The treasurer of the educational service center shall keep a record of the client's expenditure and the service or services for which the expenditure was made. On at least an annual basis, or upon the request of the client's governing body or its treasurer or fiscal officer, the treasurer of the service center shall notify the client's treasurer or fiscal officer of the expenditures recorded under this division. The client's treasurer or fiscal officer shall include that information in the financial report made by the treasurer or fiscal officer at the next meeting of the client's governing body that occurs following receipt of the information. Sec. 3313.849. The governing bodies of two or more city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, may mutually agree to share supervisory, curriculum, teaching, special education, professional development, or any other services offered by an educational service center and may pool their funding to pay the cost of receiving those services. Each of the governing bodies of the districts or schools participating in shared services pursuant to this section shall specify in its service agreement with the service center under section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3326.453313.847 of the Revised Code which services that the participants have agreed to share, any other districts or schools participating in the shared services, and the amount of funds that the governing body will contribute toward the total cost of the shared services. Each governing body's funding contribution shall be paid to the service center in accordance with section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3326.453313.847 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The authority granted under this section is in addition to the authority granted to school district boards of education under section 3313.841 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.11. (A) As used in this section: (1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "base amount" is equal to $356,250. (2) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "funding base" means an amount calculated by the department of education and workforce that is equal to the amount an educational service center would have received under Section 265.360 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly for fiscal year 2020 using the student counts of the school districts with which the service center has service agreements for the fiscal year for which payments under this section are being made. (3) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "general phase-in percentage" for an educational service center means the "general phase-in percentage" for school districts as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (4) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, "student count" means the count calculated under division (G)(1) (H)(1) of section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department of education and workforce shall pay the governing board of each educational service center an amount equal to the following: The educational service center's funding base + [(the amount calculated for the educational service center for that fiscal year under division (C) of this section - the educational service center's funding base) X the educational service center's general phase-in percentage for that fiscal year] (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall pay the governing board of each educational service center an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (C) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department shall calculate an amount for each educational service center as follows: (1) If the educational service center has a student count of 5,000 students or less, the base amount. (2) If the educational service center has a student count greater than 5,000 students but less than or equal to 35,000 students, the following sum: The base amount + [(the educational service center's student count - 5,000) X $24.72] (3) If the educational service center has a student count greater than 35,000 students, the following sum: The base amount + (30,000 X $24.72) + [(the educational service center's student count - 35,000) X $30.90] Sec. 3319.80. (A) The governing board of any educational service center may engage the services of a dyslexia specialist to provide training for teachers of grades kindergarten to four on the indicators of dyslexia and the types of instruction that children with dyslexia need to learn, read, write, and spell. If a service center provides this training, it shall make the training available to local school districts within the service center's territory and to other school districts, community schools, and STEM schools that have contracted for the training from the service center under section 3313.843, 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3326.45 3313.847 of the Revised Code. If a governing board of any educational service center does not provide the training, a group of local school districts within the service center's territory may engage the services of a dyslexia specialist to provide training for teachers independently. A school district or school may require the training authorized under this section for its teachers as part of the district's or school's regular in-service training programs. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning disorder that is neurological in origin and that is characterized by unexpected difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities not consistent with the person's intelligence, motivation, and sensory capabilities, which difficulties typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language. (2) "Dyslexia specialist" means a person who is trained and certified in a multisensory structured language program that meets the level II specialist criteria set by the international dyslexia association's knowledge and practice standards or standards from any other nationally recognized organization that specializes in issues surrounding dyslexia, or any subsequently adopted standards. Sec. 3513.255. This section is subject to section 3513.256 of the Revised Code. The name of each candidate for election as a member of a governing board of an educational service center shall appear on the nonpartisan ballot in the school district the candidate seeks to represent on the governing board. Each nominating petition shall be signed by fifty qualified electors who reside in one of the following, as applicable: (A) The school districts over which the educational service center governing board has jurisdiction, in the case of any candidate running for a position on any educational service center governing board other than a governing board established in accordance with section 3311.054 of the Revised Code; (B) The subdistrict in which the candidate is running, in the case of a position on a governing board of an educational service center established in accordance with section 3311.054 of the Revised Codethe school district. Each nominating petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county in which the central administrative offices of the educational service center governing board are most populous portion of the school district is located not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the general election, provided that no such petition shall be accepted for filing if it appears to contain signatures aggregating in number more than three times the minimum number of signatures required by this section. A board of elections shall not accept for filing a nominating petition of a person if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code for any other position as a member of a governing board of an educational service center or position as a member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for a municipal or township office. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying petitions when the number of verified signatures equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. Sec. 3513.256. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, for the purpose of nominating candidates for a position as a member of the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district or a position as a member of a governing board of an educational service center, the board may adopt, by resolution upon a three-fifths majority vote of its total membership, procedures for a nonpartisan primary election. Such procedures shall specify the following: (1) That the primary election for nominating candidates for a position as a member of that board shall be held on the same day as the primary election for nominating all other candidates for public office in that year; (2) That nominating petitions shall be filed with the board of elections not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election; (3) That the primary election shall take place only if the number of candidates for nomination for a position on that board, as verified by the board of elections, is at least one more than two times the number of available positions on that board at the general election; (4) That the number of candidates advancing from the primary election to the general election shall equal two times the number of available positions on that board at the general election. The board shall notify the board of elections upon adoption of a resolution under this division. No such resolution shall apply for a particular election unless the resolution is adopted at least one hundred twenty days prior to the deadline specified in the resolution to become a candidate for nomination at that election. Subject to division (B) of this section, the resolution shall apply to all subsequent nominations for a position as a member of that board. (B) Not earlier than five years after the adoption of a resolution under division (A) of this section, the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district or the governing board of an educational service center may rescind that resolution by subsequent resolution upon a three-fifths majority vote of its total membership. The board shall notify the board of elections of any resolution adopted under this division. No such resolution shall apply to a particular election unless the resolution is adopted at least one hundred twenty days prior to the deadline to become a candidate for nomination at that election under the nomination procedures the resolution is rescinding. Subject to division (D) of this section, the requirements of Chapter 3513. of the Revised Code shall apply to all subsequent nominations for a position as a member of that board. (C) Any candidate nominated pursuant to a resolution adopted under division (A) of this section shall appear on the nonpartisan ballot at the general election as prescribed in sections 3505.04, and 3513.254, and 3513.255 of the Revised Code. (D) Nothing in this section prohibits or shall be construed to prohibit the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district or the governing board of an educational service center that has rescinded a resolution under division (B) of this section from subsequently adopting the same or different procedures for a nonpartisan primary election by adopting a resolution under division (A) of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 755.16, 3311.05, 3311.053, 3311.0510, 3313.01, 3313.376, 3313.843, 3313.845, 3313.846, 3313.848, 3313.849, 3317.11, 3319.80, 3326.45, 3513.255, and 3513.256 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3311.054, 3311.056, 3311.057, and 3311.059 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. (A) As used in this section, "client" and "service agreement" have the same meanings as in section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. (B) The requirements of this act apply only to a service agreement between an educational service center and a client that is entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.